pl: Typ opalenizny: Ciemny; Stopniowo; Natychmiastowy; Środek; Inne
nb: Garvetype: Mørk; Gradvis; Instant; Middels; Annet
vi: Loại rám nắng: Sẫm màu; Dần dần; Trà uống liền; Vừa; Khác
fr: Type de bronzage: Foncé; Progressif; Instantané; Moyen; Autre
zh-TW: 助曬類型: 深; 漸進; 即溶; 媒介; 其他
sk-SK: Typ opálenia: Tmavý; Postupne; Okamžité; Stredný; Iné
th: ประเภทแทน: แบบเข้ม; แบบค่อยเป็นค่อยไป; แบบทันที; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος μαυρίσματος: Σκούρο; Βαθμιαίος; Στιγμή; Μέση; Άλλο
ja: 日焼けの種類: ダーク; グラジュアル; インスタント; 媒体; その他
it: Tipo di abbronzatura: Scuro; Graduale; Immediata; Medio; Altro
nl: Bruiningstype: Donker; Geleidelijk; Direct; Medium; Andere
sv: Typ av bränna: Mörk; Gradvis; Omedelbar; Medium; Övrigt
hu: Barnító típusa: Sötét; Fokozatos; Azonnali; Közepes; Egyéb
fi: Tangenttityyppi: Tumma; Asteittainen; Pika; Keskimääräinen; Muu
ru: Тип загара: Темный; Равномерный; Мгновенный; Средний; Другой
ko: 태닝 유형: 어두운; 점진적; 즉시; 매체; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta barve porjavitve: Temna; Postopna; Takojšnja; Srednja; Drugo
cs: Typ opálení: Tmavý; Postupný; Instantní; Médium; Jiné
zh-CN: 美黑类型: 偏黑; 逐渐; 速溶; 媒介; 其他
de: Bräunungstyp: Dunkel; Graduell; Sofortig; Medium; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип тен: Тъмен; Постепен; Моментален; Среден; Други
da: Solfarvetype: Mørk; Gradvis; Instant; Medium; Andet
tr: Bronzluk Tipi: Koyu; Kademeli; Hızlı; Orta; Diğer
en: Tan type: Dark; Gradual; Instant; Medium; Other
lt-LT: Įdegio tipas: Tamsus; Palaipsnis; Momentinis; Vidutinis; Kita
ro-RO: Tip bronz: Închis; Treptat; Instantaneu; Mediu; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de bronze: Escuro; Gradual; Instantâneo; Médio; Outro
es: Tipo de bronceado: Oscuro; Gradual; Instantáneo; Medio; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de bronzeado: Escuro; Gradual; Instantâneo; Médio; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta tena: Tamni; Postupni; Trenutni; Srednji; Ostalo